fr: Caractéristiques de construction des fûts du kit de batterie: 10 plis; 3 plis; 5 plis; 6 plis; 7 plis; 8 plis; 9 plis; Fût en acrylique; Fût en fibre de verre; Construction hybride; Multi-plis; Anneaux de renfort; En douves; Cintré à la vapeur; Autre
zh-TW: 鼓組鼓腔結構特點: 10 層; 3 層; 5 層; 6 層; 7 層; 8 層; 9 層; 壓克力鼓肚; 玻璃纖維鼓肚; 混合結構; 多層; 加強環; 桶狀拼接; 蒸氣熱彎; 其他
ja: ドラムキットのシェル構造機能: 10プライ; 3プライ; 5プライ; 6プライ; 7プライ; 8プライ; 9プライ; アクリルシェル; ファイバーグラスシェル; ハイブリッド構造; マルチプライ; レインフォースメントリング; ステイヴ; スチームベント; その他
ro-RO: Caracteristici ale construcției carcasei kitului de tobe: 10 straturi; 3 straturi; 5 straturi; 6 straturi; 7 straturi; 8 straturi; 9 straturi; Tobă din acril; Tobă din fibră de sticlă; Construcție hibridă; Multi-strat; Inele de întărire; Stave (din doage); Îndoit la abur; Altele
sk-SK: Vlastnosti konštrukcie korpusu súpravy bicích: 10-vrstvová; 3-vrstvová; 5-vrstvová; 6-vrstvová; 7-vrstvová; 8-vrstvová; 9-vrstvová; Akrylový korpus; Sklolaminátový korpus; Hybridná konštrukcia; Viacvrstvová; Výstužné prstence; Doštičkový (Stave); Ohýbaný parou; Iné
tr: Davul seti gövde yapı özellikleri: 10 katlı; 3 katlı; 5 katlı; 6 katlı; 7 katlı; 8 katlı; 9 katlı; Akrilik gövde; Fiberglas gövde; Hibrit yapı; Çok katlı; Takviye halkaları; Çıtalı; Buharla bükülmüş; Diğer
de: Konstruktionsmerkmale der Drumkessel: 10-lagig; 3-lagig; 5-lagig; 6-lagig; 7-lagig; 8-lagig; 9-lagig; Acrylkessel; Fiberglaskessel; Hybridbauweise; Mehrlagig; Verstärkungsringe; Fassbauweise; Dampfgebogen; Sonstige
fi: Rumpusetin runkorakenne: 10-kerroksinen; 3-kerroksinen; 5-kerroksinen; 6-kerroksinen; 7-kerroksinen; 8-kerroksinen; 9-kerroksinen; Akryylirunko; Lasikuiturunko; Hybridirakenne; Monikerroksinen; Vahvistusrenkaat; Kimpirunko; Höyrytaivutettu; Muu
en: Drum kit shell construction features: 10-ply; 3-ply; 5-ply; 6-ply; 7-ply; 8-ply; 9-ply; Acrylic shell; Fiberglass shell; Hybrid construction; Multi-ply; Reinforcement rings; Stave; Steam-bent; Other
lt-LT: Būgnų rinkinio korpuso konstrukcijos savybės: 10 sluoksnių; 3 sluoksnių; 5 sluoksnių; 6 sluoksnių; 7 sluoksnių; 8 sluoksnių; 9 sluoksnių; Akrilo korpusas; Stiklo pluošto korpusas; Hibridinė konstrukcija; Daugiasluoksnis; Sutvirtinimo žiedai; Skersinių lentelių; Lenktas garais; Kita
ko: 드럼 키트 쉘 구조 기능: 10겹; 3겹; 5겹; 6겹; 7겹; 8겹; 9겹; 아크릴 쉘; 유리 섬유 쉘; 하이브리드 구조; 다중 겹; 보강 링; 스테이브; 스팀 벤트; 기타
pl: Cechy konstrukcyjne korpusów zestawu perkusyjnego: 10-warstwowa; 3-warstwowa; 5-warstwowa; 6-warstwowa; 7-warstwowa; 8-warstwowa; 9-warstwowa; Korpus akrylowy; Korpus z włókna szklanego; Konstrukcja hybrydowa; Wielowarstwowa; Pierścienie wzmacniające; Konstrukcja klepkowa (stave); Gięte na parze; Inne
es: Características de construcción de los casos del kit de batería: De 10 capas; De 3 capas; De 5 capas; De 6 capas; De 7 capas; De 8 capas; De 9 capas; Casco de acrílico; Casco de fibra de vidrio; Construcción híbrida; De múltiples capas; Anillos de refuerzo; Por bloques; Doblado al vapor; Otro
nb: Konstruksjonsfunksjoner for trommesettskall: 10-lags; 3-lags; 5-lags; 6-lags; 7-lags; 8-lags; 9-lags; Akrylskall; Glassfiberskall; Hybridkonstruksjon; Flerlags; Forsterkningsringer; Stavlimt; Dampbøyd; Annet
nl: Drumstel ketel constructiekenmerken: 10-laags; 3-laags; 5-laags; 6-laags; 7-laags; 8-laags; 9-laags; Acrylshell; Glasvezelshell; Hybride constructie; Meerlaags; Verstevigingsringen; Duigen; Stoomgebogen; Anders
pt-BR: Características da construção do kit de bateria: 10 folhas; 3 folhas; 5 folhas; 6 folhas; 7 folhas; 8 folhas; 9 folhas; Casco de acrílico; Casco de fibra de vidro; Construção híbrida; Múltiplas folhas; Anéis de reforço; Em aduelas; Dobrado a vapor; Outra
zh-CN: 鼓套件外壳构造特点: 10 层; 3 层; 5 层; 6 层; 7 层; 8 层; 9 层; 亚克力鼓腔; 玻璃纤维鼓腔; 混合结构; 多层; 加固圈; 拼接鼓腔; 蒸汽热弯; 其他
ru: Особенности конструкции корпусов ударной установки: 10 слоев; 3 слоя; 5 слоев; 6 слоев; 7 слоев; 8 слоев; 9 слоев; Акриловый корпус; Стекловолоконный корпус; Гибридная конструкция; Многослойный; Усиливающие кольца; Из клепок (Stave); Гнутая паром (Steam-bent); Другое
sl-SI: Značilnosti konstrukcije celotnega oboda bobna: 10-slojno; 3-slojno; 5-slojno; 6-slojno; 7-slojno; 8-slojno; 9-slojno; Akrilni trup; Trup iz steklenih vlaken; Hibridna konstrukcija; Večslojno; Ojačitveni obroči; Sestavljeno iz deščic; Parno upognjeno; Drugo
it: Caratteristiche costruttive kit fusto della batteria: 10 strati; 3 strati; 5 strati; 6 strati; 7 strati; 8 strati; 9 strati; Fusto in acrilico; Fusto in fibra di vetro; Costruzione ibrida; Multistrato; Anelli di rinforzo; A doghe; Piegato a vapore; Altro
pt-PT: Características da construção do kit da bateria: 10 camadas; 3 camadas; 5 camadas; 6 camadas; 7 camadas; 8 camadas; 9 camadas; Casco de acrílico; Casco de fibra de vidro; Construção híbrida; Várias camadas; Anéis de reforço; Aduela; Curvado a vapor; Outro
vi: Đặc điểm cấu tạo vỏ trống: 10 lớp; 3 lớp; 5 lớp; 6 lớp; 7 lớp; 8 lớp; 9 lớp; Vỏ acrylic; Vỏ sợi thủy tinh; Cấu trúc hỗn hợp; Nhiều lớp; Vòng gia cố; Ghép thanh; Uốn bằng hơi nước; Khác
sv: Funktioner för konstruktion av kit skal: 10-lagers; 3-lagers; 5-lagers; 6-lagers; 7-lagers; 8-lagers; 9-lagers; Akrylstomme; Glasfiberstomme; Hybridkonstruktion; Flerlagers; Förstärkningsringar; Stavlimmad; Ångböjd; Övrigt
bg-BG: Характеристики на конструкцията на корпуса на барабана: 10-слоен; 3-слоен; 5-слоен; 6-слоен; 7-слоен; 8-слоен; 9-слоен; Акрилен корпус; Корпус от фибростъкло; Хибридна конструкция; Многослоен; Подсилващи пръстени; От отделни дъги; Огънат на пара; Друго
el: Χαρακτηριστικά κατασκευής κελύφους ντραμκιτ: 10 στρώσεων; 3 στρώσεων; 5 στρώσεων; 6 στρώσεων; 7 στρώσεων; 8 στρώσεων; 9 στρώσεων; Ακρυλικό κέλυφος; Κέλυφος fiberglass; Υβριδική κατασκευή; Πολλαπλών στρώσεων; Δακτύλιοι ενίσχυσης; Από δούγες; Καμπυλωμένο με ατμό; Άλλο
cs: Konstrukční vlastnosti korpusu bicích: 10vrstvé; 3vrstvé; 5vrstvé; 6vrstvé; 7vrstvé; 8vrstvé; 9vrstvé; Akrylový korpus; Sklolaminátový korpus; Hybridní konstrukce; Vícevrstvé; Zpevňovací prstence; Z latí (stave); Ohýbané v páře; Ostatní
da: Trommesættets konstruktionsegenskaber: 10-lags; 3-lags; 5-lags; 6-lags; 7-lags; 8-lags; 9-lags; Akrylkedel; Glasfiberkedel; Hybridkonstruktion; Flerlags; Forstærkningsringe; Stavbygget; Dampbøjet; Anden
hu: A dobkészlet héjának szerkezeti jellemzői: 10 rétegű; 3 rétegű; 5 rétegű; 6 rétegű; 7 rétegű; 8 rétegű; 9 rétegű; Akril dobtest; Üvegszálas dobtest; Hibrid felépítés; Többrétegű; Erősítőgyűrűk; Dongás; Gőzölve hajlított; Egyéb
hr-HR: Značajke konstrukcije kompletne školjke bubnja: 10 slojeva; 3 sloja; 5 slojeva; 6 slojeva; 7 slojeva; 8 slojeva; 9 slojeva; Akrilno tijelo; Tijelo od stakloplastike; Hibridna izrada; Višeslojno; Prstenovi za pojačanje; Izrada od letvica (stave); Savijeno parom; Ostalo
th: คุณลักษณะโครงสร้างลำตัวของชุดกลอง: 10 ชั้น; 3 ชั้น; 5 ชั้น; 6 ชั้น; 7 ชั้น; 8 ชั้น; 9 ชั้น; ตัวกลองอะคริลิก; ตัวกลองไฟเบอร์กลาส; โครงสร้างแบบไฮบริด; หลายชั้น; วงแหวนเสริมความแข็งแรง; แผ่นไม้ต่อ (Stave); ดัดด้วยไอน้ำ; อื่นๆ